Title
Review for Scream (1996)
Number of Reviews
31

Author
Chad Polenz
Scream
Chad'z rating: *** (out of 4 = good)
1996, R, 111 minutes [1 hour, 51 minutes]
[horror]
starring: Neve Campbell (Sidney), Courtney Cox (Gail Weathers), Skeet Ulrich
(Billy), Matthew Lillard (Stu), written by Kevin Williamson, produced by
Cathy Konrad, Cary Woods, directed by Wes Craven.
Of all the genres out there, horror is probably the most difficult to work
with in terms of making something really original (aren't they all about
stupid teenagers getting hacked up?). Given that, you'd think satirizing the
genre would be simple, but "Scream" disproves both of these ideas. It works
as a wholly original horror film by, ironically, blatantly admitting it's a
"Dead Teenager Movie" and exploiting itself.
The film opens in typical "slasher flick" style by depicting a girl (Drew
Barrymore) home alone on a Friday night getting ready to watch some "scary
videos" with her soon-to-be-arriving boyfriend. The phone rings and it's a
guy with a scary, but somehow charming voice. The two talk until the guy
sounds like a psychotic stalker and the mood becomes full of thick suspense
within a matter of minutes. Since this is a horror film you know what's going
to happen, but the script is so fluid and the scene shot with such
plausibility you can't help but be caught up in the tension of it all. It's a
90s take on countless bad scenes of such from the 70s and 80s and it works.
In fact, this is how the film works as a whole. The horror genre is pretty
much dead (no pun intended) as far as Hollywood is concerned, so what makes
the film appealing is the realistic way it deals with the plot of
masked-psycho-killer-on-the-loose-in-a-small-town. The main characters are
mostly teens who grew up on "Dead Teenager" movies and look back at them with
a more intelligent and mature manner. When they hear about the masked
murderer they can't believe what's happening because it's so much like a
movie but this time it's real (well, you know what I mean).
I'm afraid to describe any of the numerous details, even giving away the
basic plot might be too much of a spoiler. Basically, it's the story of a
girl named Sidney (Campbell) whose mother was raped and murdered a year ago,
and now the masked murderer who killed the girl in the beginning is after
her. Since this isn't a sequel to anything it's obvious the killer must be
someone right under our nose, but who could it be? 
Williamson's script, as directed by Craven makes every character seem like a
suspect, not because they seem like they'd be a silent psychopath but because
they don't (it's always the last person you suspect eh?). One by one, main
and supporting characters are knocked off but done so in such close proximity
to each other (in terms of physical space and elapsed time) it's impossible
to tell who the killer is. 
The only problem I had was the execution scenes where the characters always
manage to fight back and stall the killer, but of course trap themselves in
the process. Sometimes this seems just plain  cheesy (why does only Sidney
turn into a superhero but not the other victims?).
I'm not sure about the ending though. In one way you could say it follows
the logical conclusion of the film when it reveals the killer and their
motive, but in another way you could say it contradicts the entire premise by
doing so. I found the ending to be a bit more surrealistic and violent than
necessary. Maybe there shouldn't have been an ending at all, but since the
entire film exploits itself in leading up to the ending I guess it makes
sense.
"Scream" isn't a work of genius, but it's not a bad movie. Sometimes it
tries too hard to make for suspense, but it works as a whole by constantly
throwing plot twists and making us wonder what's going to happen next. When's
the last time a horror movie did that?
Please visit Chad'z Movie Page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz - over 140
new and old movies reviewed in depth - not just quick capsules and blind
ratings. Also, check out The FIRST Shay Astar Web Page @
http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz/ShayAstar.html

Author
Jason Overbeck
Scream is the best and worst thing to happen to the horror genre. 
Horror films were pretty much gone in recent years and Scream revived
them, it has also probably killed the horror film without
self-referencing dialogue.  Now like Halloween, Psycho or Night of the
Living Dead we have a horror film that will create scores of imitators,
for better or worse.
Scream starts with a masterpiece scene that could make an exceptional
short film.  A girl is home alone in a big spooky house.  She gets a
phone call from a stranger, who slowly becomes more threatening and
deadly.  The stranger then puts her through a movie trivia test, the
results of which could prove fatal to her.  These scenes are taunt and
unrelenting and start Scream's flare for taking standard horror film
cliches and turning them on their heads.
After the opening tension the film settles down into a group of
teenagers stuck in a horror film (al a Halloween, Friday the 13th, etc.)
and gives them satirically smart dialogue and a darkly comic surrounding
in their High School.  The group consists of two girls (Campbell - our
hero and McGowan) and four boys (Ulrich - Campbell's boyfriend, Lillard
- McGowan's boyfriend, and Kennedy - movie-addicted nerd).  
The film has many key scenes that work very well.  As when Kennedy
explains the probable killer to Lillard or as he explains the rules
("Never Have sex!." He yells as Campbell is deflowered).  There is also
a wonderful scene that has Campbell call the bluff of the killer on the
phone.
A lot of credit has to be paid to screenwriter Kevin Williamson and
director Wes Craven.  They both handle the film marvelously.  The
script, which was part of a major studio bidding war, is very smart and
funny.  So funny that most horror directors passed because they wee
confused of the films actual genre (even though the original title was
Scary Movie).  Craven is a natural choice to direct this film because he
never really takes his films that seriously anyway.  He tried a similar
mix of horror and comedy with Wes Craven's New Nightmare and Vampire in
Brooklyn, the first was successful.  He plays this film expertly careful
not to be too funny in key scenes that require empathy for dying
characters and he also finds ways to keep comedy up while anticipating
violence.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Wes Craven
Writer: Kevin Williamson
Starring: Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Skeet Ulrich, Rose McGowan, David
Arquette, Drew Barrymore, Matthew Lillard, Jamie Kennedy, Liev
Schreiber, Henry Winkler, Roger Jackson, Linda Blair, Wes Craven
You thought that the national entity known as the "slasher flick" was
dead?  Guess again (*corny diabolical laugh*).  Wes Craven, who's career
revolved around that little sub-sub-genre of the horror flick, brings us
the new 90s fresh take on that particular group of films, which has
brought back the "slasher flick" with a little concious twist - whether
we like it or not.
But in all seriousness, "Scream" is a surprisingly great flick.  Instead
of focusing on a group of horny teenagers, "Scream" puts its focus on a
surrealistic group of teens who have grown up watching the 80s slasher
flicks, can name any cliche out of it (example: while watching
"Halloween," one of them shouts out "Here's the obligatory nude
scene!"), and even the more obsessive ones can point out anything out of
any horror flick.  It's a nice fresh idea, methinks.
"Scream" opens with one of the best openings in a movie I've really ever
seen.  A teenager (Drew Barrymore, with a wig that I like, and seem to
be the only one who thinks so) is home alone in a house in the middle of
nowhere, getting ready to let her boyfriend in the door so they can
watch a "scary movie."  Then she gets a phone call...okay, well, you
know what happens, 'cause it seems to be the most parodied thing of the
year.  But it's a gripping, hysterical, and satirical little frightfest,
gradually getting scarier as it goes on, cheifly due to the direction
and the acting by Drew, who just conveys growing fear.  It sets up the
film nicely, by the way.
Cut to Sydney (Neve Campbell), our protagonist, who's mother was
conveniently murdered a year before, and who's alleged killer, Cotton
Weary (Liev Schreiber), is in a nasty trial.  She has a Johnny
Depp-looking boyfriend (Skeet Ulrich, luckily Depp's dead ringer), and a
distaste for horror movies.  And soon, she finds herself getting calls
from the same guy(s) who killed Drew in the first scene.  After a run-in
with the killer (who is dressed in a frightening black cape, and wears a
mask resembling that of Edward Munch's great painting, "The Scream"), we
are all launched into a deliciously fun world of whodunit, as well as
some good old cliche-ridden scenes of goriness, which are somehow
scarier now that the whole self-concious factor has been tossed in.
Some of the other characters/suspects are: Tatum (Rose McGowan),
Sydney's best friend; Stuart (Matthew Lillard), Tatum's hyperkinetic
boyfriend; Deputy Dewey (David Arquette), the inept police
officer/brother of Tatum; Randy (Jamie Kennedy), the obsessive film geek
who can quote any horror flick (guess which one I identify with?); and
Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox), a bitchy tabloid reporter.  The film has
some good old wholesome/delicious fun with playing with who the
killer(s) is/are, and to tell who it is would just take away from a good
half of the fun of the film.
There's a lot of uses of cliches, but all are handled with some lovely
self-concious fun.  We all know that when the big-breasted chick says
she's gonna go out to the empty garage to get some more beers that she
won't be coming back.  We all know that when the girl is sitting in the
locked car, the killer will enter through the back hood.  But so does
the film.  There's a great scene where the film geek (love this guy)
stands up in the middle of watching "Halloween" to preach to everyone
the rules of staying alive in a horror flick, without even knowing that
they're about to be in the middle of a grisly bloodbath.
The film also features billions and billions of references to horror
films, blatant and sly.  There are direct lines out of past horror films
(i.e. a character saying "We all go a little mad sometimes" is, duh, a
line from "Psycho), as well as entire sequences.  I couldn't catch a ton
of them, but I'm sure there's some totally obsessive film geek even
geekier than me re-watching and re-watching and re-watching this flick
to catch every single horror film allusion.  "Scream" is basically a
horror film geek's wet dream.
Of course, there's the downside of "Scream," which is pretty much the
equivalent to the downside of "Star Wars."  You've noticed that the
slasher film has been reborn, even if it is sometimes semi-self-concious
like this one.  Sure, we get critically acclaimed stylish horror films
like "Mimic," but we also get crap like "Wishmaster," and wannabe
"Scream" flicks like "I Know What You Did Last Summer."  And the sequel
will hopefully be good, but I'm starting to doubt it (although that
scene between Dewey and Randy in the commercials is great).
"Scream" is, essentially, a fantastically fun flick to watch, even after
repeat viewings, and preferably with a large group of people.  I
remember seeing it again in a crowded midnight showing during the third
wave of its popularity, and the "Rocky Horror Picture Show" type fun of
watching it, and yelling at some of the people in it.  "Scream" is
basically the best horror film I've seen since...I'm going with "The
Shining."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Steve Kong
Scream is a movie that is not afraid to poke fun at the genre from which it
comes from.  Wes Craven is well known for his horror films, his most known
is Nightmare on Elm Street.  In Scream Craven knows that the slasher films
are dead, and that most audiences aren't going to be scared of a murderer
in a mask, or are they?
In Scream all the characters are literate in horror films.  They know the
ins and the outs of what to do if there is a crazed serial killer in your
town.  They know who and who are not at risk of falling victim to the
crazed serial killer.  And this sets up for a strange horror film that is
funny in most respects.  Craven makes good at building up tension in each
scene, and if it is not a scene where tension is needed, Craven keeps us
guessing as to who the killer really is.  Craven, working off of Kevin
Williamson's script, crafts a movie that is not a complete spoof or comedy,
but is a tense scary film that doesn't worry about poking fun at itself.
All the actors and actresses put in a good effort in Scream.  It was nice
to see Skeet Ulrich with a better role to work with, the last time I saw
him he was in the disappointing film Touch with Bridgette Fonda.  Neve
Campbell does a good job as Sidney the main character in Scream.
The film is fun, but it is not for the weak of heart or stomach.  The film
is a horror film so a lot of blood shed is expected, but the film does get
pretty violent at times.  If you're in for a good scare, see this film.  If
you want a fun film to watch, see this film.  Don't miss Scream.  And as a
character reminds us, never ever say, "I'll be right back."

Author
JABII
Twelve years ago, director Wes Craven gave audiences "A Nightmare on Elm
Street", and terrified an entire generation. After an ungodly number of
terrible sequels, Mr. Craven has collaborated with writer Keven Williamson on
something quite new. "Scream", is a rare item indeed. A serious horror movie in
which all involved seem to realize they are in a horror movie. 
A serial killer, obsessed with old horror movies, is stalking a small
California town. After the brutal murders of two high school students in the
beginning of the film (one of the movie's most shocking and tense scenes), a
group of high school students decide to figure out who the killer is. Sidney
Prescott (Neve Campbell), is more or less the leader of the group, and her
mother had been killed the year before. As the teens search for the killer's
identity, everyone becomes a suspect. Things are made more interesting by a TV
reporter, Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox), and a deputy (David Arquette) who are
also trying to determine the killer's identity.
This film is not for the squeamish, be forewarned. It just barely squeaked by
an NC-17 rating for exessive gore.  I can't, in good conscience, give a blood
splattered horror movie a higher rating than four stars, but this is truly one
of the best I've seen. The only weak point in this film seems to be Neve
Campbell's acting at times. It's not that she does a bad job, she simply isn't
as convincing as the rest of the cast. In particular, Skeet Ulrich and Matthew
Lillard are quite good. Lillard plays Campbell's boyfriend, and Lillard is a
goofy member of the group. Jamie Kennedy is a riot as the horror movie expert
of the gang, spending a good deal of time spouting off lines from horror films
and quoting the rules for how to survive a horror flick.
Another excellent member of the cast, though she isn't in it for too long, is
Drew Barrymore. Playing a terrified student, home alone one night at the
beginning of the film, she does a marvelous job. One last thing I must point
out, is how much I enjoyed the mystery aspect to the story. The majority of
horror films make it quite clear who the killer is. Not here. The murderer
wears a ghoulish halloween costume which hides the face behind a rather scary
looking fhost mask.
This movie is a lot of fun for those who have strong stomachs. If you don't
normally enjoy slasher flicks, stay far away from this one. Watch for two
rather surprising actors in here too. Henry Winkler, as the high school
principal, and Robert Englund (Freddy Kreuger) shows up very quickly as a
janitor.
* * * * * - One of the greatest movies ever made, see it now.
* * * * - Great flick, try and catch this one.
* * * - Okay movie, hits and misses.
* * - Pretty bad. See it if you've got nothing better to do.
* - One of the worst movies ever. See it only if you enjoy pain.
E-mail with comments at: JABII@aol.com

Author
Chuck Dowling
Scream (1996) ** out of ***** - Cast: Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Skeet
Ulrich, David Arquette, Drew Barrymore. Written by: Kevin Williamson.
Directed by: Wes Craven. Running Time: 111 minutes.
The popularity of "Scream" puzzles me. When I first saw the trailers for it,
I came away with the notion that it didn't look very intelligent, or
different than any other slasher movie. After seeing the film, I agree with
my initial assessment.
In "Scream", someone wearing a grim reaper-type halloween costume is trying
to kill off Neve Campbell and her little friends who, just like most slasher
movies, think "What? A friend was murdered? Cool!". So who is the killer? Oh
who could it be? Who cares. I particularly enjoyed a scene where, after
Campbell is brutally attacked and almost killed (which then results in the
arrest of her boyfriend and sparks the memories of her mother's rape and
murder a year earlier), she's in the mood to party! Of all the annoying,
superficial characters, only David Arquette as a youthful rookie police
officer shines through as someone interesting.
The opening scene was wildly praised, and I have no idea why. In it, Drew
Barrymore is stalked (via the telephone) by the killer. There's nothing new
in it (maybe the telephone part), and Drew's character acts just as dumb as
any other slasher movie character. The scene is entirely overblown, and as
with just about every slasher film, the scene's music TELLS you when to jump
instead of just letting the story scare you.
The problem, as far as I can see, is the script. Writer Kevin Williamson has
obviously seen lots of horror films, but he confuses writing an intelligent
script containing some clever nods to great horror movies with an average
slasher script in which every character is a horror movie encyclopedia. All
the characters in "Scream" have way too much horror movie knowledge to be
believeable. A few of them, sure. But all? So the script comes across as
"See? I've seen lots of horror films! And I'm telling you I've seen a lot of
horror films! See? All these characters are specifically talking about the
horror movies I've seen!" One character, a geeky video store clerk who takes
his knowledge of horror WAY too seriously, annoyingly telegraphs many of the
events during the final scenes.
Also, there are too many moments where the masked killer is seemingly
supernatural and psychic. The killer can telegraph where a potential victim
might wander off to. Then there are moments where the killer might knock on
a door and then immediately vanish without a sound, even though the victim
is right there to investigate. And every time the killer attacks someone,
the victim inflicts some heavy damage upon the killer. This damage never
seems to hurt though, (ahem) as with EVERY OTHER SLASHER MOVIE.
Have I made it clear that there's no difference between "Scream" and any
other slasher movie? Sure it's infinitely better that just about every
horror release from the past two years, but almost anything is better than
another "Hellraiser" or "Halloween" installment. Wes Craven's direction is
certainly more competant than most slasher films, but in the film he keeps
making references to his own "A Nightmare on Elm Street" which gets terribly
annoying. He even goes as far to have a janitor at the school named Fred
who's dressed exactly like Freddy Krueger. It's not cute. And "Scream 2" is
filming now, with a "Scream 3" to follow it. Say, that's a new concept,
horror sequels! I wonder if all the characters in those will keep commenting
on how badly horror movie sequels "suck". I wonder how many times Craven
will make it known that all the sequels to "Elm Street" were terrible. Care
to place a wager? [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Author
Phil Curtolo
Since his New Nightmare, director Wes Craven has released several
terrible films, like Mangler and Vampire in Brooklyn. However, the end
of 1996 brought Craven's Scream to the big screen to frighten more
people.
The film stars Neve Campbell (The Craft) as Sydney Prestcott, a
character much like Heather Langencamp's in Craven's first big horror
hit, A Nightmare on Elm Street. She plays the innocent virgin who the
maniacal killer preys upon. 
The plot is a simple as any horror movie. A psychopath with a machete
or a knife or some sharp weapon preys on the youth of a small, quiet,
rural town. In this movie, someone takes their love of movies one step
too far.
The film bled talent, no pun intended. It featured some hot young stars
and a few old ones. Courtney Cox (TV's Friends), co-stars as a tabloid
reporter. Drew Barrymore (Boys on the Side) plays Casey Becker, the
first victim in the crime spree. Liev Schrieber (one of the kidnappers
in Ransom) appeared Cotton Weary. But the appearance of Henry Winkler
(THE FONZ!!!) as Principal Himbry took the taco. If you've seen the
movie, you already know that he's another victim, but how do you kill
Fonzie?
Anyhow, the story revolves around Sydney's obsession with her mother's
murder. And on the one year anniversary, the killer strikes again,
murdering innocent teenagers left and right.
Some references were made to the original horror films of the late 70's
and early 80's. For example, the school's janitor was dressed exactly
like Freddy Kreuger, minus the sharp glove. And Sydney's boyfriend's
last name, Billy Loomis (Skeet Ulrich, Albino Alligator), is the name
John Carpenter gave to his main star, Dr. Loomis, in the Halloween
series.
The climactic end of the movie throws a wicked curve ball, as the
killers are revealed. Throughout the movie, clues are given here and
there, but too many for anyone to pinpoint the actual killers other than
by guessing. Truthfully, I don't think anyone would've guessed the
killers identity until he took off the creepy mask.
If you liked Wes Craven's New Nightmare, then you'll definitely like
this witty, bloody horror movie. If you like to Scream… the go see it.
Grade: A-, **** out of *****

Author
Luke Buckmaster
>From the spine-chilling director Wes Craven, who's made himself known as one of 
most prominent figures in the genre after the well known Nightmare on Elm 
Street series and various other films, comes the best horror movie so far in 
the 90's.
If you don't agree with that statement, you'll be more likely to agree with 
this one: the reason why this super popular teen flick has been so successful 
is not because it features completely original scenes or avoids common horror 
film cliches.  Victims still run up the stairs instead of out the door, 
murderers still miraculously get inside rooms unnoticed and police seem to do 
everything but solve the crime.  No - the difference between Scream and other 
horror films is the fact that it knows that cliches are being used and parodies 
itself by regularly announcing the "rules" of a successful horror film.
Party of Five's Neve Campbell stars as Sidney who, one year before the film is 
set, lived through the trauma of having her mothered violently killed in their 
local small town.  News spreads thick and fast across the state and country, 
and in no time this murder mystery becomes the number one story in newspapers 
and TVs.
A year later, a killer is again on the loose.  The same town, the same media 
hype and a similar target - it seems that to be hunted by a homicidal freak 
runs in the family.  So as the number of murders rapidly increase and the list 
of suspects'  covers the whole town, there is only one question that needs to 
be answered - who is the killer?
Could it be the obvious boy friend Billy (Skeet Ulrich), the horror film freak 
(Jamie Kennedy), the flamboyant student Stu (Matthew Lillard), Sidney's father 
who has mysteriously disappeared, small-town cop Dewey Riley (David Arquette) 
or even TV reporter Gale Weathers (Courtnery Cox)?  Everyone is a suspect.
And when everyone is a suspect, the viewers' eye will shift suspiciously over 
every character on the screen - but all is revealed in due time and the ending 
comprises all the elements of witty cleverness that is felt from start to end. 
 Forget the average cheapo horror flick - Scream truly is a modern masterpiece. 
The only minor grumble is when you look at the films bare bones; it only really 
consists of 3 or 4 key scenes, and because every minute is so enjoyable the 
audience is left craving for more blood to fill the screen.
Many of Scream's scenes will no doubt be remembered as classic moments - the 
phone conversations alone are more than enough to remain in knife-edged 
nightmares.  Yes - it is a scary film, but in no way is Scream a nightmare to 
watch.  It's slick formula of killing off characters one by one until the list 
of potential killers gets noticeably smaller hits exactly the right note for a 
terrifying yet very entertaining experience.


Author
ismailp@removethiscapsure.net
SCREAM:  This movie bored the pants off of me.  All the self
reflecting winks at the genre just served to pull me out of the realm of
movie magic, instead of drawing me in.  There were no character
development to speak of.  Then again, I shouldn't be surprised, after
all there were no interesting characters at all!  To top it off, it
wasn't the least bit scary.
I wanted to fast forward to the end to find out if the whole thing had
been a movie within a movie, involving a screenwriter's dream sequence
brought about by a case of indigestion.  No luck, I should've followed
my gut and walked out.

Author
Adam Joyce
Scream is a film for all fans of the horror genre. Directed by Wes Craven,
well known for writing and directing the first of the Nightmare on Elm
Street movies (and signing away the rights to the sequels in the process),
the film is an analysis of horror movies within a horror movie.
The film opens with the death of Casey Becker (Drew Barrymore), a young
female, home alone, who lives away from the city. De ja vu? She is
terrorised by an anonymous caller (who just happens to have a deep and
scary voice) who asks her questions about famous horror films, and demands
that she answer them correctly or her boyfriend, who's tied up on the
patio, will die. Eventually both her boyfriend and Casey are killed. Her
death involves the typical chase through the house, lock all the doors
scenario. From here the film jumps to the local high school, where the
students discover the news about their friends. I'm sure you've heard it
all before, but that's the idea.
Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) is the next victim of the killer's terror
campaign. Throughout the film the characters discuss the ridiculous aspects
within horror films. Sidney talks to the killer on the phone (not aware of
who he is) about how stupid it is that the people in horror films run up
the stairs instead of out the front door, but once she is the victim, she
does the same herself. In this respect the film is somewhat funny, and it's
meant to be, it's a parody of real horror flicks.
Sidney survives the ordeal, and her boyfriend is taken into custody over
the matter. As the film develops almost every character comes under
suspicion of being the killer, and one has to notice the intricate details
within the film to have any idea of who the killer could really be. Gate
Weathers (Courteney Cox), a tabloid reporter, also becomes involved.
Sidney's mother was killed and raped one year previous to the time in which
the film is set, and Gate Weathers claims that the wrong man is in jail for
the crime. Hmmmm.....I wonder who could be the real killer of Sidney's
mother? Could it by any chance be the current killer in town? Probably,
because this film is all about horror stereotypes, and you have to know
them well to solve the mystery. One by one the characters are killed off,
and in the process so are the suspects.
Scream is a clever thriller/horror/comedy about horror movies. If you're a
horror film fan than you might pick up on the special touches, such as the
school cleaner wearing a red and white striped t-shirt (like Freddy
Krueger's). The film used a record amount of blood, and there is plenty of
gore to keep the audience screaming (and at times, purposely, laughing).
The film's characters even explore the rules for surviving horror films,
for example, characters must be innocent virgins or they die. You can also
watch as the characters break these rules, and then sometime later on,
suffer the consequences. The film plays on the stereotypes of other horror
films, i.e. the seemingly dead killer must come back to life for a final
battle.
The characters are portrayed suitably, in the style of all good horror
films. Scream itself is enjoyable, allowing the audience to both jump and
to laugh. If you're familiar with horror films, and especially if you're a
fan, then Scream is worth your time. 
Please visit Movie Mania at http://www.home.aone.net.au/joyce/adamframe.htm

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Neve Campbell, Rose McGowan, Skeet Ulrich, Courteney Cox, David
Arquette, Matthew Lillard, Jamie Kennedy, Drew Barrymore, Henry Winkler
Director: Wes Craven Screenplay: Kevin Williamson
Ring, RING. Ring, RING.
'Hello?' Drew asks.
(What's your favourite pizza?)
'Look I don't even like pizza. So leave me alone.'
(Put the phone down again bitch, and I'll shove pizza down your scrawny
little throat!)
'Who are you?' Whimper, whimper.
(The pizza man. I told you already. So tell me what is your favourite
pizza?)
'Look this isn't funny. My boyfriend's coming over anytime now. If you
don't leave me alone you'll have to deal with him.'
(Look outside the window)
'Why?'
(Just do it!)
'SCREAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAM!'
(So tell me, what is your favourite pizza?)
'Leave him alone. What do you want?'
(I want to play a game)
'What game?'
(Answer the question correctly, and I promise that I won't drop the
200,000 pizzas on your boyfriend's head)
'Okay, I'll play just don't hurt him.'
(Good then answer the question, what's your favourite pizza?)
'I only eat Vegetarian.'
(So tell me, what is the other name for 'Asterolis Hungarus Marolis',
which is a common ingredient used in the making of vegetarian pizzas?)
'I know this one, just give me a minute.'
(Your time is running out little girl)
'It's the ..., it's the, ....it's the Capsicums.'
(Yes, very good.)
'Now let my boyfriend go.'
(The games, not over.)
'But you said you'd let him go if I answered the question correctly.'
(I lied. Now here's the real 'live or die' question. If you answer this
one correctly, he gets to live.)
'Noooooooo. That's not fair.'
(Come on, you're doing so well. So tell me, in a 'B.B.Q. Leg-Of-Chicken'
pizza, what is the main ingredient?)
'That's a tough one. Hold on ....it's .....it's.....'
(Your time is running out little girl)
'It's chicken.'
(Wrong.)
'I know it's chicken. I've eaten it a hundred times.'
(I thought you said you were vegetarian?)
'I lied.'
(The answer is still wrong. Everyone knows that there is no such thing
as a 'B.B.Q. Leg-O-Chicken Pizza.', and even if there were such a thing,
the main ingredient would be chicken feet.)
'That's not fair. That was a trick question!'
(Bye, bye boyfriend.)
'No. SCREAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAM!'
 From 'The Very Private Telephone Conversations' of TMT Voon.
I've never quite liked horror movies. So I am glad I watched this
particularly movie on video. You can tone down the screams with the
volume control; and the blood bath of butchering frenzy is nicely
reduced to a red fuzz on the screen with the fast forward button. I
openly, and unashamedly admit, that I have never watched any classic
horror movies like 'Friday the Thirteenth', 'Nightmare on Elm Street',
'Halloween', 'The Shining', 'Edward Scissorhands' (it's a joke) etc etc.
And I have no great plans to watch any either. Excessive bloodiness is
best left in abattoirs, and off the big screen.
However, I can say that the director Wes Craven, a name which inspires
thoughts of shiny metal blades and ripping skin, has made a 'horror'
flick much more acceptable by throwing in elements of a
mystery/thriller, to balance out the unpleasant elements of pure horror.
He has also carefully chosen a cast i.e. Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Drew
Barrymore names which are not synonymously linked with horror, to help
draw a more general audience into that acquired taste for blood.
I have to admit that I thought the serial killer was the 'boyish'
policeman from the word go. Boy was I wrong! I guess the bad hunch was
an unfortunate after effect of watching 'Primal Fear'. Although the plot
is unbelievable, it will keep you guessing right to the very end, and
that's what any movie really needs to do if it is to get a favourable
response from it's viewers.
Comment: What did you say? I can't hear you?

Author
Jamey Hughton
WARNING: THE FOLLOWING COMMENTARY MAY REVEAL SPOILERS FROM THE "SCREAM"
FILMS, PRIMARILY "SCREAM 3". IF YOU HAVEN'T SEEN THE FILM AND WISH TO DO
SO WITH NO KNOWLEDGE OF THE PLOT, AND BY SOME MIRACLE OF NATURE YOUR
HIGH SCHOOL CRONIES HAVEN'T SPILLED ALL THE BEANS, THEN PROCEED WITH
CAUTION.
Well, here I am. It's been several days since my `Scream 3' experience,
and I'm still wearing a gratified smirk across my face. Now, this
particular smirk is not merely due to the fact I thought the film was a
riot. It has to do with closure....the final lace being neatly tied in
the phenomenal horror series that made slasher films fun again. And
perhaps more fun than ever before.
I've seen `Scream 3' twice. The cutting edge wit of Kevin Williamson's
caustic pen may be absent, but worthy successor Ehren Kruger finishes
the series on a positive note of great fulfillment. I willingly concede
that `Scream 3' is the sloppiest of the trilogy, with a generic serial
killer plot-line that occasionally emits the pungent stench of a good
formula gone sour. But it's still fun. Watching Williamson's characters
evolve with such prudent care is a treat for all fans of the series.
Now, when did the smirk materialize across my face exactly? It was the
final shot of the movie, which performs a miracle of closure. Never mind
the obtrusive plot holes that were scattered throughout the film earlier
(namely with the unmasking of the killer)... this is a brilliantly
effective way for Kruger to conclude the movie and the trilogy. Kevin
Williamson would concur.
Which is why I ask Miramax to end it here. Let `Scream' rest in peace
and maintain the amount of dignity warranted by a proper burial like
this. After the biggest opening weekend of the series - an estimated
$34.7 million in box office ticket sales - the idea of a `Scream 4'
could have perhaps crossed the mind of certain executives at Miramax. I
shudder to think of the possible resurrection of the series after such a
commendable finale. With that frightening piece of information in mind,
I offer the following tribute to the `Scream' franchise, which shattered
the rules of conventional horror in more ways than one. Just think.... a
slasher series with actual character development, that didn't take its
core audience for merely a pack of adolescent idiots who were stupid
enough to shell out the cash. I love the whole `Scream' universe, and
with this memorial, I'd just like to get a few things off my shoulder
and say adios for the last time.
Yeah, I know. It's just a stupid movie. But while watching the `Scream'
movies, I get that nostalgic feeling of blissful glee knowing that this
is the highest form of barbed wit and palatable ingenuity that the genre
will ever see. The `Scream' films (or at least the first two) are among
my favorites, despite the fact I didn't award either with my highest
rating. Keep in mind, dear readers, that ‘favorite' doesn't necessarily
go alongside ‘best'.
I rewatch them with the same amount of jubilant excitement and discovery
every time, acknowledging that there are enough pop culture references
and wink-wink in-jokes to even satisfy those who despise slasher films
with a passion. Take one scene in `Scream 2', where a pair of dim-witted
sorority sisters (Portia De Rossi and Rebecca Gayheart) explain that the
hoopla surrounding the movie `Stab' is only related to our heroine
Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) in a `six degrees of Kevin Bacon sort of
way'. Or in the original `Scream', when tanktop-lovin' Tatum (Rose
McGowan) notes that the murders in their small town of Woodsboro are
beginning to sound like `something out a Wes Carpenter flick'. Just for
the record, that's a combination of horror pioneer and `Scream' director
Wes Craven and another legendary gore-meister by the name of John
Carpenter. And then, there's `The Rules'. You don't know The Rules?
According to obsessively paranoid film geek Randy Meeks (Jamie Kennedy),
there are certain rules one must abide by to successfully survive a
horror movie.....
1) You can never have sex.
2) You can never drink or do drugs.
3) Never, ever, under any circumstances, say `I'll be right back'.
Randy is obviously knowledgeable on the topic of the endlessly recycled
teen slasher genre. With `Prom Night', `Sleepaway Camp', and the
seemingly infinite `Friday the 13th' franchise, one could identity a
popular cinematic trend throughout the 1980's. Hmmm...if someone were to
lampoon this trend in a sly parody of modern horror, the result would be
amusing. Right? It took until 1996 for rookie screenwriter Kevin
Williamson to do so. With `Scream', the horror genre was revitalized
into a hip new slice of bloody pop culture where movie references
abound. It was a rarity that promised the audience an ample quota of
scares and laughs... and delivered. But, when you get right down to it,
the `Scream' films are about murder. They're merely customary slasher
films, elevated substantially by a self-mocking manner that is sharp,
witty and refreshing. Which brings me to....
1) Drew Barrymore in `Scream'. This positively blood-chilling opening
sequence will be what the series is remembered by; the trademark moments
when the intensity and cunning brilliance of the screenplay and
direction reach peak form. Casey Becker (Barrymore), home alone to watch
a scary movie and make Jiffy Pop, receives a call from a pestering
gravely voice. He calls again, and again.... until it becomes evident
that he is outside her home with the strict intent of gutting her like a
fish before the night is through. After she answers a trivia question
(category: horror villains) incorrectly, she watches in petrified horror
as her boyfriend's intestinal tract spills out onto her patio. What is
arguably the most horrific sequence in the trilogy ends with an image
that strikes down the viewer with morbid dread: Casey's bloody body,
dangling from a tree, is discovered by her parents. Not surprising, the
remainder of the film is unable to recapture the type of merciless,
apprehensive terror as seen with Casey Becker's untimely demise.
2) Jamie Kennedy in `Scream 2'. Kevin Williamson risked creating a mob
of angry, devastated fans with this shocking (and particularly ballsy)
move. Fan favorite Randy Meeks, with cellular phone in hand, carries on
a crackling conversation on a college campus park with the killer.
During this time, Dewey (David Arquette) and Gale (Courteney Cox
Arquette) madly dash to scout the possible caller, tackling students
with cell-phones to the ground. Unfortunately, Randy gets grabbed from
behind and hauled into a news van, where he is repeatedly stabbed to
death.
The park scene represents some of Williamson's sharpest writing, but
director Wes Craven is the real craftsman to mention, fashioning an
eerie atmosphere in a scene set in broad daylight - not an easy thing to
do. An incredibly effective crane shot, revealing that Randy is the only
person in the vicinity, shifts the tone from edgy humor (produced by the
quirky phone conversation) to claustrophobic suspense perfectly. And
after the deed is done, the sight of viscous blood seeping through the
crack under the van door (not to mention Gale's horrified reaction) just
leaves you cold and shivering.  A worthy farewell to a great character.
3) Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps in `Scream 2'. It's your worst nightmare:
a movie theater packed with drooling, raving fanatics in ghostface
costumes, clutching plastic knives everywhere you turn. This is the
environment when Maureen (Pinkett) and Phil (Epps) enter a sneak preview
of `Stab', the movie-within-a-movie based on the slayings in `Scream'.
After discussing the politics of African-American driven films (or lack
thereof), they enter, despite the fact that Maureen is opting for the
Sandra Bullock flick down the street. Should've gone with Sandra,
because `Hope Floats' is still better than getting gorily diced any day
of the week.
In a nutshell: Phil goes to washroom, gets stabbed through the stall
door. The masked murderer travels back to the theater and sits next to
Maureen, donning Phil's jacket. Maureen is slashed repeatedly, as the
movie-going onlookers watch the murder transpire, thinking it's some
publicity stunt for the film. Talk about setting the mood... this
opening sequence is creepy and unsettling. You'll be squirming in your
seat, but at least the events in `Stab' are amusing: Heather Graham,
playing Drew Barrymore's character from the original, reenacts the
famous opening murder with a classic lampoon of farcical glee.
Honorable Mentions:
-Tatum has garage door problems in `Scream'.
-Tom (Matt Keeslar) `smells the gas' in `Scream 3'.
An unexpected backlash arose with the release of `Scream 3': certain
people suddenly started bagging on `Scream 2'. Let me clear this up.
In my opinion, `Scream 2' could possibly be the best of the trilogy. It
offers more thrills than the original, the humor is fresh and equally
amusing, and the characters develop with devoted compassion. I guess
what the majority of viewers are irritated with is the finale, when the
whodunit is revealed. Where the original was a somber and serious
climactic revelation, this one is more like a `Scooby Doo' adventure. Oh
no, Shaggy! It's not bothersome reporter Debbie Salt at all... it's
actually Mrs. Loomis (Laurie Metcalf), Billy's mother returning for her
vengeance! Ok, it is a little goofy. But, even though it stands as the
weakest link of the film, it's still decent enough. And good ol' Kevin
Williamson keeps the wit vibrating throughout the entire series of
complications, as when the `freaky Tarantino film student' Mickey
(Timothy Olyphant), the other murderous half behind the ghostface mask,
battles a surprisingly resilient Sidney on a theater stage. `Sid, you
got a Linda Hamilton thing going,' Mickey says as the scale finally tips
in his favor.
The conclusion is only so-so, but I think people forget what an
efficient horror masterpiece Williamson and Craven had crafted before
the stupidity factor kicked in.
Financially, `Scream 2' was just as successful as its predecessor.
Critically, it fared even better than the decidedly mixed reception that
`Scream' received upon its original release (don't argue with me -
that's a fact). While `Scream 2' is one of the best sequels I've ever
seen, `Scream 3' is simply a fun but totally generic slasher movie.
Anyone who favors the third over the second has forgotten what the
`Scream' movies were about to begin with.
Dwight `Dewey' Riley began as a simple-minded Deputy in the small town
of Woodsboro. Unfortunately, during a courageous sweep of a bloody crime
scene, he was stabbed in the back. Dewey returned, albeit with a limp
from severed nerve damage, to protect his friends from further possible
danger on a college campus. Unfortunately, he was stabbed in the
back.... many, many times. But Dewey pulled through. Now unable to
continue with his law-enforcing duties, Dewey applied his knowledge to
the job of technical consultant on a film set. Again, Dewey showed
commendable bravery in battling another evil, costumed psycho who wanted
to mutilate his dear friends.
Kudos to David Arquette for, three times over, playing such a likable
character so well. It only occurred to me how much I love the doofus
when, during a few near-death scenarios in `Scream 3', I let out a
piercing howl of `LOOK OUT, DEWEY!!!!' ....well, not really. But Dewey
is still the most charming, lovable personality in the `Scream'
universe. When he walks into a room, the mood suddenly becomes light and
enjoyable. How many different ways can I say it? The guy is awesome. So
Dewey, take care, and know that you will always have a welcome
place..... in our VCR.
I don't like to single anybody out. Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox
Arquette, Jamie Kennedy, Liev Schreiber... in your returning roles, you
were (*sniff*) inspirational. And everyone else - Skeet Ulrich, Matthew
Lillard, Elise Neal, Jerry O'Connell, Duane Martin, Parker Posey, Jenny
McCarthy and associates - I appreciate your help as well. `Scream', you
shall be remembered in a positive light. R.I.P., good buddy.
Your Comments Appreciated!  movieviews@hotmail.com

Author
Nick Schaden
     Aren't we all sick of those classic cliches in horror movies? Take
the annoying habit of grossly disproportional female victims to run upstairs
or downstairs when they should be running out the door. It's a weakness that
destroys the horror in far too many horror flicks. "Scream", directed by
horror master Wes Craven, makes a refreshing twist by poking fun at the
genre Craven's worked with so much in previous years. Unfortunately, while
good ideas surface, the movie stumbles too much for a recommendation.
    A series of high school murders have shocked a community. An attractive
young high school student, Sidney (Neve Campbell) gets several threatening
calls and later gets viscously attacked by the murderer. Does this mean
"Scream"'s plot will follow right in line with all the other slasher movies?
Heavens no. Instead, the movie concentrates on a mystery and makes the
audience try to guess which one of the many teenage suspects is the
murderer. While Scream is light years away from "The Maltese Falcon"
material, Wes Craven amazingly makes the plot moderately interesting. I
actually cared for Sidney's plight, and I thoroughly enjoyed the many jokes
the actors and the movie makes toward previous horror movies.
    In other small doses we see Wes Craven's mastery of the horror genre.
For example, in the beginning of the movie Drew Barrymore is threatened and
attacked by the movie's murderer. It's done expertly well, the
cinematography and sound makes for a great introduction to the movie.
    However, after this well made intro, suddenly the rest of the movie
falls into several weaknesses. First, the acting leaves something to be
desired - the far majority of actors are new to the acting scene and it
shows. For example, Campbell's acting falters in certain scenes, her attempt
to portray a young woman deeply in fear is largely reduced to widening eyes
and breathing hard - it isn't that convincing. In addition, ironically the
movie falls much into the same cliches of many horror movies - the victims
and cops are just too stupid and the murderer is just too smart. Finally,
after all the twists and turns the audience goes through, I was really
hoping for the movie to wrap up nicely. Unfortunately, the logic free twist
in the movie's end combined with the lame motive of the murderer's crime
make "Scream" end on a sour note.
    In sum, I'll remember "Scream" as an original spin upon the horror
genre. Unfortunately its weaknesses cut this movie below recommendation
material.

Author
Bryant Frazer
I once watched a film teacher suffer a meltdown after a
classroom screening of THE LAST HOUSE ON THE LEFT. LAST HOUSE
was Wes Craven's debut feature, an exruciatingly graphic
rape-revenge film shot almost documentary-style in 16mm, and
something about it was more than our instructor could bear.
As the lights came up, he stalked to the front of the
classroom muttering that he didn't think anybody should be
allowed to watch such a pernicious film. This was the
first-ever convincing argument, he said, in favor of
censorship. He threw around words like "inept" and "artless,"
and the students in the class were put in the uncomfortable
position of having to defend the merit of some of the most
sadistic instances of humiliating sexual violence ever
committed to celluloid.
"Did you know it was based on Ingmar Bergman's THE VIRGIN
SPRING?" I finally asked. Stopped him right in his tracks. He
stood up there for a few long moments, scratching his chin,
wondering if it could possibly be so -- could this vile,
torturous excuse for cinema actually have been inspired by
the much revered work of one of Europe's greatest filmmakers?
And more importantly, was the director a lot smarter than he
had been willing to give him credit for?
Since then, Wes Craven has gone on to more auspicious
projects, including THE HILLS HAVE EYES as well as the first
and last movies in the Nightmare on Elm Street series, an
uncommonly imaginative knock-off from the slasher boom of the
late 70s and early 80s. The series went downhill as it
converted Craven's genuinely creepy Freddy Krueger character
into a stand-up comic, and one of the characters in Craven's
newest movie, SCREAM, comments on that: "They all sucked,
except the first one."
Craven is a filmmaker of ideas, but he's not entirely
successful at bringing those ideas to fruition. Still, his
movies are consistently more interesting than their
mainstream Hollywood counterparts. THE PEOPLE UNDER THE
STAIRS is an elaborate metaphor for the class struggle in
Reagan's America, complete with Ron and Nancy surrogates. His
SHOCKER was a misfire, a heavy metal slasher movie that was
aimed perhaps a little too narrowly at its target audience --
but who would guess that Craven would make his points about
the pervasiveness of television as our new fantasy realm by
directly referencing Buster Keaton's SHERLOCK JR.?
Television plays a big role in SCREAM, as well. In the
brilliantly conceived opening sequence, cute-as-a-button
Casey (Drew Barrymore) gets a distasteful phone call from a
psycho who wants to play games with her. When she asks why he
wants to know her name, he tells her it's because he wants to
know who he's looking at. When she asks what he wants, he
tells her he wants to see what her insides look like. Reduced
to a quivering wreck, Casey cowers in the corner, next to a
TV screen that glows blue from its blank video signal. Later
in the movie, a bunch of drunk high schoolers will gather
around another TV set to watch HALLOWEEN, and that movie's
electronic soundtrack will become SCREAM's background music.
Craven is interested in the contrast between movie reality
and objective reality -- or at least reality as it appears in
his movie as compared to the reality that appears in everyone
else's movies. You follow? The chief conceit of SCREAM is
that it knows it's a scary movie, and its characters -- at
least the smart ones -- are keenly aware of the conventions
that make scary movies such a predicament for the people
caught in them.
So Neve Campbell (she was in THE CRAFT, and a TV series
called Party of Five) plays Sidney as a more savvy version of
the prototypical babe-in-distress. Like her pal Tatum (the
terrific Rose McGowan from THE DOOM GENERATION), she can run
verbal circles around her male counterparts, but may be a
little too headstrong for her own good. The movie begins in
the wake of Casey's death, and the local high-schoolers
aren't exactly shedding tears over her grave. These kids are
into gallows humor and gossipy speculation on the identity of
the real killer, who wears an elongated death's head mask
that becomes a hot item for pranksters at the local high
school. So many of the people in this community are so
twisted that it seems any one of them could be the killer. In
fact, the screenplay is gleefully peppered with clues that
could implicate nearly every character in the movie.
Sidney's father is leaving town for the weekend, which means
that she'll be at home alone -- her mother was murdered in
gruesome fashion just a year ago. Sidney's cellular-phone-toting
boyfriend Billy (Skeet Ulrich, also in THE CRAFT) has a
bad habit of climbing in through her bedroom window, and
becomes a prime suspect in Casey's murder. Sidney is getting
phone calls from the same creep who rang Casey, and they're
starting to carry the uncomfortable echo of her mother's
murder. The TV-ready Courteney Cox is aptly cast as a
uniquitous reporter from a tabloid program, and David
Arquette plays the awkward Sheriff's deputy who may have
something to hide. Also involved is Randy (Jamie Kennedy), a
nerdy video store clerk who lectures his peers on how to
survive a horror movie (don't have sex, don't do drugs, never
say "I'll be right back").
Craven's main triumph here is proving that plausibility
needn't have anything to do with effective filmmaking --
SCREAM made me jump in my seat more effectively than just
about anything since THE EVIL DEAD. Here's a movie where the
killer stalks victims through the grocery store in full
Halloween regalia, where a video camera broadcasts images
into a news truck on a 30-second delay (what, they're waiting
for the picture to bounce back off the satellite?). It's a
big bloody crowd-pleaser, and a treat for thoughtful fans of
the genre. Knowing references to the genre include a
discussion of Jamie Lee Curtis's breasts and the cameo
appearance of Craven himself as a school janitor in Freddy
Krueger clothing. But when Tatum makes passing reference to
"something out of a Wes Carpenter movie," it really is one
wink too many.
What's more remarkable than the labored reflexivity is
Craven's reconstruction of a nearly picture-perfect slasher
movie with some important twists. (A year ago, he thought he
had contracted with Miramax to remake THE HAUNTING, but plans
went awry.) SCREAM has a casual feeling about it, almost like
something done on a lark. He's angling to create something
akin to the conceptually audacious WES CRAVEN'S NEW
NIGHTMARE, which was a fairly sober meditation on why we need
horror stories (and one of his most engaging films). Still,
SCREAM ultimately disappoints because what's missing from
this "scary movie" is a sense of what's really scary. If
SCREAM had even one truly horrifying moment, a scene that
made you shudder instead of just jolting your ass out of your
chair one more time, it might carry a little more weight. As
is, it's simply the slasher movie to end all slasher movies
-- too bad it comes about 10 years too late.
As always, Craven's reach exceeds his grasp. The film is shot
in anamorphic Panavision, but unlike his compatriot John
Carpenter, Craven has no real sense for how to use the
widescreen frame. The screenplay (by first-timer Kevin
Williamson) has too many clever ideas that never really pan
out. The constant references to HALLOWEEN in particular are
more hamfisted homage than plot device, and the
aforementioned video camera gimmick is wasted. And while the
movie is smart as a whip about the conventions of horror
movies, it's conspicuously silent on the subject of what
drives them, or why we enjoy them.
Finally, I'm not sure what we're supposed to make of the
delirious final reels, in which the killer explains, against
all apparent evidence to the contrary, that "Movies don't
create psychos; they just make psychos more creative." Good
point, but are we expected to take a psycho's word for it?
And why is a television literally instrumental in one
character's death? Never mind -- it's all so fast and fun
that you barely have time to wonder at such stuff. Strap in
and enjoy the ride.

Author
Scott Renshaw
(Dimension)
Starring:  Neve Campbell, Skeet Ulrich, Courteney Cox, David Arquette,
Drew Barrymore, Matthew Lillard, Rose McGowan, Jamie Kennedy.
Screenplay:  Kevin Williamson.
Producers:  Cary Woods, Cathy Konrad.
Director:  Wes Craven.
MPAA Rating:  R (violence, adult themes, profanity)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     In the late 70s and early 80s, theater screens were overrun by a film
genre which had primarily teenage audiences filling the seats and
sociologists shaking their heads.  It was the golden age -- if that isn't
a gross misapplication of the term -- of the slasher movie, where
cutlery-wielding crazies turned every possible day on the calendar
(HALLOWEEN, FRIDAY THE 13TH, PROM NIGHT, MOTHER'S DAY, MY BLOODY
VALENTINE) into a stomach-churning ordeal.  These films usually differed
only in the manner of the violent killings, leading to a numbing
predictability deserving only of parody.  Wes Craven's SCREAM wants to
have some fun with the conventions of the slasher movie, but not at the
expense of providing a few scares of its own.  That presents problems as
well as opportunities, as the self-aware script sometimes diffuses the
tension Craven can create as a director.
     In SCREAM, the students at Woodsboro High are facing more profound
problems than the usual homework and bad skin.  Two students have been
murdered -- stalked and disemboweled by a lunatic -- and everyone is on
edge, particularly Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell).  It is nearing the
first anniversary of the day Sidney's mother was raped and murdered, and
when the masked killer comes after Sidney, she begins to wonder if the two
events are related.  Tabloid TV reporter Gail Weathers (Courteney Cox)
wonders, too, and she becomes determined to find out the connection
between Sidney and the murders.  As students gather for a party, including
Sidney, her boyfriend Billy (Skeet Ulrich) and best friend Tatum (Rose
McGowan), the reporter stakes out the scene, waiting for the inevitable
bloodbath.
     As SCREAM begins, it looks like it is going to be a fairly
conventional horror film, if an unusually gripping one.  A 12-minute
prologue finds Drew Barrymore terrorized over the phone by the killer,
quizzed on horror movie trivia to save her life.  Most of the familiar
tropes of the slasher movie are in place -- the absentee parents, the
improbably massive house with plenty of glass, the ever-alarming ringing
phone -- but the sequence is still scary stuff, with Barrymore providing
an effective and convincing portrait of mounting panic.  Though much of
SCREAM becomes a joke at the expense of monotonously violent horror films,
Craven is not about to spit in the face of the genre which made his
career.  Horror films in general are not the target in SCREAM -- horror
films with no style or imagination are, and Craven provides both
throughout the film, though nowhere as effectively as the opening.
     What happens between the scares is what gives SCREAM its knowing
edge.  Kevin Williamson's script is loaded with references to horror films
-- it seems that half a dozen are aimed at Craven alone -- and loaded with
characters who have seen other horror films.  Many of those references are
spelled out quite literally, and they are the least interesting.  When one
character explains the "rules" of the slasher film, including the "sex
equals death" paradigm, it seems as though Williamson believes he is the
first person to have noticed them.  Some of the most subversive humor is
the least obvious, however.  One young woman is unable to escape the
killer through a doggie door because -- like all horror film ingenues --
her breasts are nearly as large as her head; another running gag finds the
masked killer repeatedly knocked around like one of the Three Stooges.
SCREAM also turns into something of a whodunnit, a rarity among slasher
films, and Williamson and Craven trot out plenty of suspects:  moody
boyfriend Billy (Ulrich, looking more like Johnny Depp than Depp himself),
Billy's wired friend Stu (Matthew Lillard), a repressed video clerk (Jamie
Kennedy), the mild-mannered deputy (David Arquette), the school principal
(Henry Winkler!) and even Sidney's father.  SCREAM plays with expectations
effectively, making the guessing game part of the in-joke.
     The guessing ends in a climax which, while certainly surprising,
isn't particularly effective.  It is also excessively drawn out, as writer
and director seem to engage in an ideological battle over whether it is
going to be the climax to a horror film or a commentary on the climaxes of
horror films.  In the end it is both, which is to say that it is neither.
Some of the gags are quite funny, but the suspense all but vanishes in the
final fifteen minutes as the characters talk their way through a
comparison of this finale to the traditional finale.  The script for
SCREAM is not clever enough to provide a consistently witty thriller; it
is sometimes witty and sometimes thrilling, but never both.  That alone
makes SCREAM stand out from its genre cousins, though, as Wes Craven
reminds us that terror can be fun, and not simply a grueling march
through gore-spattered holidays.

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     This splatter spoof from long-time genre director Wes Craven (A
NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET) wraps with a finale so uproarious and over-
the-top that I left the theater almost giddy.  The sequence, one of the
year's more-memorable and pure gold for anyone with a taste for blood,
is set at a Friday night slasher-movie marathon, with a trivia-testing
masked killer knifing everyone in the house, from the obligatory teenage
girl in the tight top to the wiseacre half-nerd horror-expert.  That guy
also gets the biggest laughs in the movie, both on-screen and off, when
he stands up to recite The Rules:  "Never have sex.  Never drink or do
drugs.  And, never, ever, say 'I'll be right back.'" And, of course they
do, and they are, and more than one person exits a room, never to
return.  You'll die, too, laughing as Craven recreates a scene from
HALLOWEEN, and then cross-cuts between it and the original, the latter
playing on a VCR.  If only the rest of the movie were as ingenious.  In
fact, the first hour so closely (cheaply?) resembles the source material
that you may just fall asleep.
Mike Legeros - Raleigh, NC, USA, Earth
legeros@pagesz.net (h) - legeros@unx.sas.com (w)
I'm also on the Web!  http://www.pagesz.net/~legeros/

Author
James Brundage
This is what everyone's been waiting for, a movie that's funny, scary,
brilliant, and has a message at the same time. Enough blaming of the movies
to satisfy the Christian Coalition. Enough creative one-liners to make
anyone laugh. Enough black comedy to have us all forget the body count. And
enough corn syrup (fake blood) to satisfy even the wackiest of gore-hounds.
SCREAM has something for everyone.
What is it? Not a horror movie or a comedy, or even a dark comedy, but a
cross-over between all of these, incorporating parodies with fright,
brilliant cinema with purposefully terrible acting. A human element that
rubs off as so surreal in context that its almost laughable. And characters
you will never forget.
The plot is that of any slasher movie from 1970 onward, put in the words of
Neve Campbell in the line "What's the point? They're all the same: some
stupid killer stalking some big-breasted girl who can't act who's always
running up the stairs when she should be going out the front door..."
What's worse is all of this happens to the characters, making for a darkly
comic in an Edward Scisscorhand's type fashion, making you laugh in
hindsight. And then there are Randy's (the movie-freaked mind that may or
nay not have lost its reality base) rules to surviving a scary movie: all
both followed and broken.
What's the best thing? The mystery. This movie doesn't just slice and dice,
telling you who the killer is right off the bat, but instead waits until the
end to explain it all, and has fun every step of the way. Sit back, relax,
enjoy, and throw your popcorn into the air as the knife comes up one to
slice through the air as the person is to be silenced in one final SCREAM.

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Neve Campbell; Courteney Cox; David Arquette; Jamie Kennedy & Rose
McGowan
Scream is the movie that breathed new life into the genre of film that was
rapidly on its way to a very painful extinction. Namely, the teen slasher
film. Not only is Scream stylish, and incredibly smart, it also has a budget
comparable to about 20 typical slashers combined.
Scream centers on Sydney Prescott (hottie Neve Campbell), a high school
student in the small town of Woodsborrow. Syd has a little problem, there is
a serial killer on the loose and she is his next intended victim. But Syd
and her friends aren't about to be the typical horror film victims in
waiting. Oh no. You see they've seen all of the horror films so they know
what not to do. They realize that there are rules to a horror film and if
you don't follow the rules, they will be carrying you off in a body bag at
the end of the movie. The problem for Syd and her friends is that the killer
appears to have seen all the same movies that they have. In a sense, Scream
spoofs the rest of the genre, because the characters know that typical
horror film characters are stupid, so they just don't do what typical
victims in waiting do in a horror film. And even when Scream does give us
some of the typical ingredients of normal horror films; it does it with a
wink and a nudge. Almost as if to say, "it wouldn't be a horror film without
these cliches".
Scream's success is accomplished by the fact that the characters in this
movie actually have personalities. Not something usually encountered in your
typical horror film characters. At least you don't normally find
well-rounded ones anyway. (We're talking personalities here, not silicone
implants.) This film also gets credibility from the fact that it has
established stars in it. Albeit not huge stars, but Neve Campbell and
Courtney Cox have both been quite successful on television. And just for
good measure, director Wes Craven throws in a couple of cameos from Drew
Barrymore (E.T.) and Henry Winkler (yes, The Fonze) to add to the star
quality of the film. Star power aside, two unknowns really steal the movie.
Jamie Kennedy plays a video store clerk who has seen every horror film ever
made. He spends most of the movie referencing old horror movies for the best
ways to avoid becoming a victim of the killer. The other scene-stealer is
Matthew Lillard. The only way to describe Lillard is that he reminded me of
a young Michael Keaton. His part might be relatively small, but he has some
of the best scenes in the movie.
Admittedly, this might not be the scariest film that I've ever seen, but
what it lacks in chills, it makes up for in style. The fact that this movie
doesn't resemble the typical low-budget-cookie-cutter-slasher counts for a
great deal in my book. Add the fact that we have a director and actors that
actually know what they are doing, and Scream is in a class all by itself.
It's very rare that I will walk out of a theater and really be struck by
just how good a movie was. When I first saw Scream in the theater, I still
remember thinking that this was one of the best films that I had seen in a
long time. It is certainly the best horror film that I have ever seen.
Admittedly, horror film fans will get more of the inside jokes, but even if
you aren't a fan of Halloween or Friday The 13th, it should still be very
entertaining. If you are one of the few that hasn't seen Scream, check it
out.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Wes Craven's career as a director is starting to get more interesting - he
seems to be finally exploring the mysteries of horror as he did in the classic
1984 film "A Nightmare On Elm Street." His subsequent films didn't match that
one's genuine power or mystery as witnessed by the horribly misguided "Wes
Craven's New Nightmare" or the jarring horror-comedy "Vampire in Brooklyn."
"Scream" is a visually impressive movie and it attempts to revise and transcend
the typical slasher flick with mixed results. At the very least, it tries.
"Scream" is set in a typical L.A. suburb where the local high school teenagers
worship the torpid slasher flicks of the 80's, including the Jamie Lee Curtis
screaming roles from "Halloween" to "Prom Night." They know all the formulas
and cliches by heart, and they worship them with unmitigated glee. Neve
Campbell, from TV's "Party of Five," stars as Sidney, a virginal teenager who
is receiving strange calls from a stalker; he keeps quizzing her on slasher
movies. Sidney's mother was killed by a stalker, and she is torn (pardon the
pun) by how he mentions intimate details of her. Enter Sidney's pals, which
include her anxious boyfriend, Billy (Skeet Ulrich), and her best friend (Rose
McGowan from "The Doom Generation"). I will omit the other cast members for now
because part of the fun of this thriller is that we don't know who the killer
is, it could be any of Sidney's clique of friends. 
Strange murders start occurring at the high school and Billy is a prime
suspect. Feeling that her life is in danger, Sidney attends an all-night
slasher video party with her pals. Although not as naive as her friends, Sidney
should know better than to go to her friend's house (after all, she watches
those dumb movies, too). No medals for anyone who guesses that the killer may
be there. And if these teenagers are so clever, why do they make the same
mistakes as the cartoonish teens in those movies? 
"Scream" is a smart, very entertaining satiric thriller in the first
three-quarters. It is only until the last quarter that the movie opts to be as
bloodily nauseating and predictably stupid as any of the slasher flicks it
pretends to mock. Instead of throwing us surprising thrills and chills, it goes
for nonstop gore and an avalanche of stabbings and pointless cruelty - blood
filling up the screen is not scary. Craven takes the easy route rather than
enthralling us in our seats with unimaginable horror as he does in roughly the
first hour and ten minutes. 
The pleasures in "Scream," though, are many. The electrifyingly intense and
scary opening sequence with Drew Barrymore is one of the most thrilling
sequences in any thriller I've ever seen. Another plus is the killer who wears
a black cape, and a mask that resembles Edvard Munch's painting, The Scream,
thus making the killer a monstrous figure of pain. The performances by the
actors set the right tone for this material. Neve Campbell makes Sidney into an
effective heroine; a girl tortured by the painful memory of her mother's death,
and with the sad notion that her boyfriend could be the killer. Rose McGowan is
beguiling to watch with her huge eyes and Betty Boop lips as Sidney's
no-nonsense pal, and there's the brooding Skeet Ulrich who resembles Johnny
Depp from the original Elm Street. There's also a pointed jab at the media with
a "To Die For" news reporter (Courteney Cox) who wants to find this stalker by
any means necessary. There are also numerous in-jokes and cameos, including Wes
Craven himself as a janitor named Fred and, if you're quick, Linda Blair as a
reporter.
"Scream" is scary, effective and sometimes haunting, and balances elements of
comedy, horror and satire with ease. But when the typical stalker-in-the-house
routine ending comes in making Sidney less stronger than she was previously,
it's all blood and guts with no imagination or real sense of terror. Craven's
idea was to make a film that would transcend all the cliches of the slasher
film genre, invent some new ones, and bring a creepy sense of menace to the
proceedings. By the end, it's Craven wallowing in the bloody thrills rather
than poking fun at them, and reinventing them. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 
E-mail me with your comments and/or arguments at Faust667@aol.com  or 
jerry@movieluver.com 

Author
Jamey Hughton
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
Who thought the revival of the horror genre laid within this relatively
small-budget slasher film released in 1996? Scream surprised audiences
upon it's release, because not only did it succeed in delivering the
chills, it also had a delightful self-mocking sense of humor. Unknown
scribe Kevin Williamson added a much-needed dash of humor and cleverness
to his screenplay, making Scream quite the hot ticket for young
audiences.
After the renowned popularity of Williamson's pet project, numerous
clones began production. But none captured the shining quality of the
original Scream (except, perhaps, Scream 2). So what's Williamson's
secret? It's actually fairly simple. He doesn't create clichéd
characters; he makes his characters aware. They've seen all the horror
movies and know all the trademarks of the genre, and when they're
unwillingly placed in a situation themselves, they know how to handle
themselves (or at least, to a certain point). Scream is not some kind of
miraculous breakthrough, but it is a breath of fresh air.
The story takes place in a small, US town populated with teenagers who
look strangely like twenty-something Hollywood actors. Neve Campbell is
Sidney Prescott, a likeable senior who has dealt with the death of her
mother in the past year. Skeet Ulrich is her boyfriend, Billy, an avid
movie buff who sneaks through Sidney's window every now and again. But
he is no match for the dedication of cinema applied by Randy Meeks
(Jamie Kennedy), an intelligent geek who works at the local video store.
Then there is Matthew Lillard as the intolerable, gloating jerk Stew and
his fashion-smart girlfriend Tatum (Rose McGowan).
When their little town of Woodsboro is overtaken by a horrific double
murder, everyone is on the look-out. The killer himself wears an attire
of a spooky Halloween costume, and is now often referred to as `ghost
face'. Williamson's clever script relies heavily on the unmasking of the
murderer, and the motive for his (or her) killings. But before you go
off guessing the killer's identity, there are more suspects to address.
Reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) is at the scene of the crime, and
she and Sidney have shared a complicated past. Then, of course, there's
the charming local deputy Dewey (David Arquette), a well-meaning doofus
and also Tatum's older brother.
The brisk comedic moments in Scream are often more refreshing than the
horror. The best scenes both involve Randy spilling all the details he's
learned from years of watching scary movies. The first takes place in
the video store, where he loses his composure and screams out
`Everybody's a suspect!!!', to the confusion of other customers. The
second (and best) occurs when he explains the rules of horror movies to
friends at a party (Williamson even capitalized on the greatness of this
particular scene, and revised it to an equally amusing effect in Scream
2). In case you've forgotten these rules, here they are:
1) You can never drink or do drugs.
2) You can never have sex.
3)You can never, ever, under any circumstances say `I'll be right back'.
The final bloodbath in Scream is where I started to lose some interest.
It's too excessive, gory and a little far-fetched. Campbell shows off
her strong lungs nicely, Cox is dynamite fun playing the insatiable
bitch who wants a top story, and Arquette does unexpected marvels with
his character, who is relatively low on brain cells but shyly attempts
to hide his inadequacies. For director Wes Craven, this was definitely a
wise career move. But, the real star is Kevin Williamson, who has
written a screenplay that has revitalized the horror genre. Even as his
characters make the same mistakes as regular fright film victims do,
they are doing so with a knowing awareness. This translates into a lot
of fun.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
.......................

Author
David Landers
RATING: *** out of **** - 7.5 out of 10.0
CAST: David Arquette (Dewey Riley), Neve Campbell (Sidney Prescott), Courtney
Cox (Gale Weathers), Rose McGowan (Tatum Riley), Skeet Ulrich (Billy Loomis),
Drew Barrymore (Casey Becker)
DIRECTOR: Wes Craven
CERTIFICATION: R (USA) for excessive violence and language 
YEAR OF PRODUCTION: 1996
SCREAM is the present-day version of a horror film directed towards the
teenage audience.  And, like many of the same type of the past, it succeeded
greatly (a sequel began filming while it was still in theaters).  From horror
and thriller director-supreme Wes Craven, SCREAM is a tense, nail-biter of a
movie that, in the words of its director, "everyone really enjoys".
In my opinion, SCREAM is very similar to other works of Wes Craven (A
NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET comes to mind first).  It is about, of course, a
bloodthirsty killer who is out to kill, more than anyone, teenagers.  The
killer will not stop at anything to kill the one person he is really after,
and like all other movies of its type, SCREAM plays this out very well.
The movie begins in the Becker household, where young Casey Becker (Drew
Barrymore) is preparing her favorite movie-watching snack, popcorn.  In the
middle of her preparation, the phone rings, and a very rough, cautious male
voice is on the other end.  At first, the caller seems rather calm and
friendly.  That is, until Casey mistakingly sets off a hidden inner rage in
the caller, who suddenly turns extremely violent.  He makes very serious,
frightening threats to Casey and continues to call after she repeatedly hangs
up.  The caller informs Casey that he wants her to play a game.  The game is
a very sick one indeed, in which Casey answers movie trivia questions.  If
she gets them wrong, the penalty is death.  If she answers correct, well, the
caller *says* he'll leave her alone.  Unfortunately for Casey, she never
escapes the killer alive.
The next day at, the small town is in shock.  The high school is crawling
with police officers and reporters, including the "tabloid twit" Gale
Weathers (Courtney Cox).  Gale Weathers is not liked at all by young Sidney
Prescott (Neve Campbell), for a very serious reason.  Gale was one of the
leading reporters in a murder controversy involving Sidney's mother, who was
brutally raped and murdered in her own home.  Gale continually insisted that
the accused killer was framed and that the real killer is still on the loose.
However, Sidney doesn't believe a word of this and certainly "has it in" for
Gale.
After the school day is over, the kids are basically still in shock, at least
for the most part.  Sidney, probably most cautious due to upcoming one-year
anniversary of her mother's death, does not want to be alone in the house.
Her father is on a business trip, so Sidney pleads with her friend Tatum
(Rose McGowan) to come over.  They agree that at seven o'clock Tatum will
come over.  Somehow, Sidney falls asleep.  She is awakened a little past
seven by the phone ringing.  It's Tatum, informing her that she will be there
very soon.  However, when the phone rings again, it isn't Tatum, but the same
guy who called Casey the night before, and supposedly attacked and killed
her.  Sidney, too, falls victim to the caller, but barely escapes.
After the attack, Sidney's boyfriend Billy Loomis (Skeet Ulrich) shows up
quickly to comfort her.  However, when Sidney notices that he is dressed in
black (as was the attacker) and is carrying a cellular phone, she assumes the
worst.  Billy is arrested and held in jail, but later released because the
phone records show that he did not call her house.  Another interesting fact
is that Sidney's father is missing and cannot be found.  Dewey (David
Arquette), a town deputy and brother of Tatum, takes it upon himself to look
out for Sidney and to help find the killer.  However, it becomes unclear who
will find who first, as the killer stops at nothing to reach his apparent
prime target.
>From here, the terrorizing continues, and it looks rather obvious that it
won't cease until the killer is stopped - for good.  However, the killer's
identity is as yet unknown, and people can only assume.  The rest of the
events in the movie are equally as suspenseful, and the climax is very well
crafted.  If you are a fan of scary movies, as were most of the characters in
this film, then you should enjoy SCREAM.  And if you *really* enjoyed, fear
not, a sequel will be out before you can, well, scream!


Author
Kevin Patterson
Scream  ***1/2  (out of four)
R, 1996
Directed by Wes Craven. Written by Kevin Williamson.
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette.
"Do you like scary movies?" asks an exaggeratedly sinister voice over the
telephone, and with that, "Scream" is off and running. The bizarre phone
conversation between this unnamed voice and Drew Barrymore continues as the
caller runs down horror movie cliches. ("I am one second away from calling the
police!" says Barrymore as the call takes a threatening turn. "But they never
get there in time," the caller responds coolly.) Finally, she is challenged to
play a  game in which she has to answer trivia questions about horror movies.
If she gets them right, she lives. If not, she dies.
Despite the gruesome conclusion that this scene eventually reaches, "Scream"
is really more of a camp sendup than anything else. What makes it work better
than most spoofs, and helps it to establish at least some amount of suspense,
is that the script is never quite aware of itself. It manages to pull this off
with the clever premise that the characters, mostly teenagers, are all
familiar with the traditions and cliches of horror movies. In the James Bond
parody "Austin Powers," for example, the villain purposely engages in the
action movie cliche of giving his captives an excessive amount of time to
escape. But he doesn't do this because he's been watching James Bond movies;
he does it because he's a character in a spoof. "Scream" pushes the envelope a
little farther, even going so far as to have one character insist, "But this
is real life, this isn't a movie!" while never giving the game away and
admitting that it is, in fact, a movie.
The main character in "Scream" is Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell), a high
school student who seems to be the killer's next intended victim after she
receives a similar phone call ("The question isn't, 'Who am I?' The question
is, 'WHERE . . . AM I?'") but escapes an assault by someone dressed in a
dopey-looking "ghost-face" costume with a black robe. Among the suspects are
her boyfriend Billy, his friend Stu, local horror film geek Randy, and her
father, who has gone missing. The combination works best in the second half of
the film, when many of the teenage characters gather at Stu's house for a
party and the killer makes an appearance.
Aside from the mystery, "Scream" boasts some moments of deranged comic
inspiration to rival many recent comedies. Some of the best lines come from
Randy, who is always at hand to offer observations about how the situation
parallels that of a particular horror movie (perhaps one of those "Wes
Carpenter flicks," as one girl speculates), or, in one of the best scenes, a
lecture about the rules that a character must follow to survive a horror
movie. (In case you're wondering - never have sex, never drink or do drugs,
and never, EVER, under any circumstances, say, "I'll be right back.")  Kevin
Williamson's script is also smart enough to toss in plenty of humor that is
not directly related to slasher films, such as the weird dialogue between two
characters on a Romantic Evening Walk. ("Do you know what constellation that
is up there?" "No, which one?" "I don't know, that's why I was asking you.")
"Scream" reminded me a lot of the 1985 film "Clue" in the way it developed as
a fun, irreverent mystery-comedy. The only problem is that director Wes
Craven, a horror veteran, seems to want this to be scarier than it actually
is. A few of the killer's attacks, especially the murder of Barrymore's
character, made for genuine suspense, but most were surrounded by so much
tongue-in-cheek dialogue that I was too busy laughing to be scared by
anything. There is some general suspense of the who-will-live and who-will-die
variety, but no more so than in any action thriller, and certainly none of the
cold-blooded fear that horror movies are (I guess) supposed to inspire.
There has been a lot of talk about "Scream" as a landmark for the horror
genre, but other than a few scenes and Craven's name in the credits, there
really isn't that much to qualify it as a horror movie - at least not an
especially good one, in any case. Fortunately, there's enough campy humor for
it to earn a well-deserved place as a cult classic, and one that, ironically
enough, will probably be watched by teenagers at parties for years to come.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        SCREAM stands as the only successful meld between 
parody and terror in a horror movie. Unlike other slasher parodies 
like STUDENT BODIES, it has a sense of humor about itself but still 
manages to deliver genuine shocks. It also serves as homage to the 
great and not-so-great horror movies of the 80's, from the writer and 
director of a few great and not-so-great horror movies, Wes Craven. 
Such a set-up -- well-known horror movie director turns to self-
parody -- should be disastrous but somehow isn't.
        Craven, who is responsible for the original NIGHTMARE 
ON ELM STREET, has created the perfect inside movie for fans of 
good and bad horror movies. The settings, characters and score is 
reminiscent of many of the well-known slasher classics. The small 
town where the killings take place is even stock horror -- everyone 
knows everyone else and most of them are spoiled white kids with 
nice houses in the woods and cellular phones.
        SCREAM is one of those movies where all the characters 
can talk about is other horror movies like SILENCE OF THE 
LAMBS, FRIDAY THE 13TH and, yes, NIGHTMARE ON ELM 
STREET. One of the characters remarks that the original 
NIGHTMARE was good but all the sequels sucked, a high school 
janitor is seen wearing Freddy Kreuger's sweater and hat, and one 
of the male characters looks just like Johnny Depp, star of the first 
NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET. Just the tip of the inside joke 
iceberg.
        Unlike most horror movies, SCREAM was made on a decent 
budget and stars people you've heard of. Neve Campbell ("Party of 
Five") is the sexy young heroine, Courteney Cox is an aggressive 
tabloid TV reporter and Drew Barrymore serves as the killer's first 
victim. As the movie opens, Barrymore is home alone, making 
popcorn for the horror video she's about to watch.
        The phone rings and a mysterious voice starts asking 
questions. She hangs up on him a few times before he reveals he's 
watching her from outside, and that her jock boyfriend is tied up 
on the patio. The phone voice says he'll set them both free if she 
can answer some simple movie trivia questions, which she botches 
under the stress. So he has to kill them both.
        Cut to the next day, at the local high school. The school's 
abuzz with talk of the murders, and every student gets hauled into 
Principal Henry Winkler's office to be interrogated by the small 
town's sheriff and deputy. Later, Neve, her picture-perfect boyfriend 
(the Depp look-alike), her best friend, her weird boyfriend and his 
weird horror movie-obsessed friend discuss these murders in terms 
of other horror movies they've seen. That night, Neve is home alone 
and gets a phone call from a mysterious stranger.
        This is just the beginning. Before SCREAM is done, the 
casualties will number at least ten, but this movie is much more tame 
than the movies it offers up for parody. There are no nude scenes or 
graphic violence, probably because they're not needed as crutches 
here. SCREAM is a good horror movie on its own but it's probably 
the best anti-horror movie ever made.
        SCREAM goes so far as to establish the rules for surviving 
a horror movie, which I myself have commented on in the past. 
Here's my direct quote, which pretty much lines up with what the 
horror movie-obsessed characters in SCREAM say. "Smoking pot, 
drinking beer, sleeping with someone, insulting the main character... 
playing a practical joke on one of the other characters... taking a 
shower or spying on someone skinnydipping or taking a shower 
will get you a one-way ticket to the afterlife."
        SCREAM acknowledges these and the other main tenets 
of the modern horror movie, then goes on to break them. It's an ode 
to slasher movies, but doesn't allow its fondness for past horror 
movies to dictate the plot. You hardly ever see a horror movie this 
self-aware, funny and semi-intelligent. SCREAM shows a lot of clips 
from HALLOWEEN, the best slasher movie ever made, and actually 
comes out looking good next to them. That says a lot.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Author
Jason Wallis
"Scream" * * * * 
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Matthew Lillard, Drew
Barrymore, Rose McGowen, Skeet Ulrich and Henry Winkler 
Directed by Wes Craven 
"Scream" begins with one of the best edited and most frightening scenes
ever put on film. In it's opening, we are introduced to Drew Barrymore
(with a cool new cut), playing a teen home alone, ready to cook up some
popcorn and relax with a nice little horror flick. All of a sudden, the
phone rings; she answers it, not knowing that on the other end is a
blood-thirsty psychopath. He playfully flirts with her, always keeping a
frighteningly monotone voice. When he asks her name, she asks why he wants
to know. His response: because I want to know who I'm looking at. Terror
ensues. 
Now, if you want to see this flick because of Drew, don't even bother
because she, needless to say, gets done away with in the first fifteen
minutes. Quite gruesomely, I might add. But the violence in this film is
not mean-spirited gore as in such shockers as "Friday the 13th" and the
like. Because the film is so campy and self aware of itself, all the
violence is justified. But, tho a tad on the violent side, "Scream" does
not contain a gratuitous amount of gore. We only think we see it. It has
potential to be much, much gorier. But it isn't, and that's one of the
reasons why it's so much fun to watch. Director Wes Craven finds the
perfect balance between buckets of blood and no violence at all. In other
words, it's done with some taste. 
Anyway, let me get back to the point. Most modern horror flicks concentrate
on the gross-out factor and try to out-do each other on how much female
nudity you can squeeze into one film. Most also feature very bland
characters. In "Scream", the actors add just the right amount of charisma
to their characters. Special kudos to Matthew Lillard, who plays Stu
(possibly the coolest guy in the history of cinema). Matt doesn't make Stu
just another horny teenager; he adds something special that makes him
different from the rest. I may be going out on a limb here (correction: I
know I am), but I think this is the performance that should have captured
last year's Oscar for Best Supporting Actor (Cuba was good and all, but he
didn't make an unforgettable character like Matt Lillard did. I mean, "show
me the money"? Gimme a break). But don't get me wrong; there were other
deserving performances (particularly Dwight Yokham's awesome portrayle of
an abusive boyfriend in "Sling Blade" - but that's for another review), but
none did as great of a job as Lillard. 
It is extremely refreshing to see a movie like this; a fun, scary, well
executed (no pun intended) and incredibly enjoyable slasher flick. The plot
of the movie is simple: a crazed sociopath has seen one to many scary
movies and is now going around dressed as Father Death (one of the scariest
costumes since Michael's mask in "Halloween") picking off teen after teen.
His first victim (Drew Barrymore) went to a high school with a principal
non other than the Fonz himself, Henry Winkler. The killer begins to
terrorize a handful of students from that school, particularly
concentrating on Neve Campbell (who has a boyfriend barring a striking
resemblance to Johnny Depp from Craven's other masterpiece, "A Nightmare on
Elm Street"). 
I will not say anything more because that would be giving away the movie,
and I wouldn't even dream of doing that. The main thing that makes "Scream"
different from all those other horror flicks is that it works on two
levels. First of all, like I said, it is a splendid slasher film. Secondly,
it is an excellent homage to other horror movies (i.e. "Prom Night",
"Halloween", etc.). There's probably about fifty in-jokes in the first hour
alone. But "Scream" is far more than mere homage; it stands on it's own as
being one of the greatest horror films of all time; and I mean up there
with great flicks like "Psycho" and "Dawn of the Dead". And I don't just
mean as far as mindless entertainment goes. It really is a magnificently
crafted take on the thriller genre. In other words, check it out. It's one
of my personal faves. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
Chris Casino
Director: Wes Craven, Writer: Kevin Williamson, Neve Campbell, David Arquette,
Courteney Cox, Drew Barrymore, Henry Winkler.
I was anxious to see this for a long time. A friend of mine recommended this to me 
because he has a crush on Neve Campbell, and he wanted to prove that she's as hot as he 
thinks he is. He proved it for me all right, but the reasons I enjoy this film go way 
beyond that.
SCREAM treads on familar ground, horror movie with, as star Neve Campbell puts
it,"Some stupid killer stalking some big breasted girl who can't act who's
always running up the stairs when she should be running out the front door."
It's very familar, your typical horror film.
So why, you may ask after watching it, does it seem so new and original?
Because it treats itself as if it hasn't been done before, and thus the viewer
is disilusioned into believing that it is not old, familar tired stuff.
This raises another question: How does it do this?
Simple: The characters. They're not your typical stupid horror film victims who
don't know what the hell to do when being chased by a guy in a ski mask and a 
machette. They are horror fans, they know how stuff happens in a horror
movie, they know what to do and what not to do, and that makes it scary, and
even funny at certain times.
You can tell this just by watching the opening scene where Casey Becker (Drew
Barrymore) is making popcorn, getting ready to watch a video, and some guy
who sounds like a killer calls her up to play a game with her that involves
horror movie triva that, if she gets it wrong, will get her and her boyfriend killed.
She knows what to answer when he asks her horror film questions, she just can't
answer his final question,"What door am I at?" And that gets her killed. That
scene works because in a normal horror film, half the things that happen in that
scene would never happen.
The plot is typical horror stuff: Sidney Prescott (an impressive Neve Campbell), 
an attractive young high school student who's mother was killed a year ago
tommorrow, is being stalked by a killer who's previously murdered one of
her classmates (Casey, naturally), and everybody in this small, California
town is a suspect, including Sidney's boyfriend, Billy Loomis.
But as I said before, these people know how horror movies work, and that's what
makes it so appealing. That and the references to horror movies, like when
Casey says,"The first (NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET) was scary, but the rest sucked."
which is obviously director Wes Craven (who does a good job of poking fun of
the genre that made him a legend) patting himself on the back as he directed the first 
NIGHTMARE movie and none of the others, and when Tatum, Sidney's friend, mentions 
the director, Wes Carpenter, which is obviously an homage by writer Kevin
Williamson to not only Craven, but also director John Carpenter.
The cast is well chosen, Neve Campbell pulls off a good heroine (and unlike most
horror film heroines, she *can* act), Drew Barrymore does a good Janet Leigh impression 
for what little time she has in the film, and David Arquette is impressive. Also
good (and funny) in his role is Henry Winkler ("The Fonz") as the school principal.
I took half a point off for the unnecessary (albeit limited) appearance by FRIENDS'
Courteney Cox as reporter, Gail Edwards, Sidney's rival because she covered her 
mother's disappearance. I hate that show, I hate those actors. They're untalented, 
overexposed, and overpaid, IMHO, and I would think Wes Craven is smart enough to know 
those actors are overexposed enough, but I suppose he isn't.

Author
Christopher Null
     My review notes for SCREAM consist of three whole words:
     What has been billed as the first "really scary" movie in a long
time surprisingly lives up to its promise (due, in part, to the fact
that there hasn't been a really scary movie since THE EXORCIST III in
1990), with plenty of screaming on the screen and in the audience.  Wes
Craven's SCREAM is a true exercise in the horror film -- an in-depth
study of the genre that terrifies at the same time as it good-naturedly
pokes a little fun at itself.
     Anyway, Miramax is practically *begging* critics not to reveal the
plot, so I'll just give you the starting point:  an all-alone Drew
Barrymore answers a phone call from a deranged killer, and it goes
downhill from there.  Be aware that the "star" of the show is not
Barrymore, but is actually Neve Campbell (THE CRAFT).  And the *real*
stars are a couple of her character's friends, played by a now-blonde
Rose McGowan (THE DOOM GENERATION) and Matthew Lillard (HACKERS), who
totally steal the show.
     Of course, these are only two of the dozens of characters who serve
as Fresh Meat for our killer, the most notable of which is probably
Courtney Cox as a trashy tabloid TV reporter covering the story.
     Thank God Craven has imbued SCREAM with witty dialogue, fine plot
development, and an ending that actually seems remotely plausible. 
While he does let up with the terror in the final act (I won't be having
any nightmares tonight), I left pleasantly surprised and a bit shaken up
from so much jumping in my seat.  I'm sure you'll agree.  It's a...
well... a scream.
-Christopher Null  /  null@filmcritic.com  /  Writer-Producer
-Visit the Movie Emporium at http://www.filmcritic.com
-and Null Set Productions at http://www.filmcritic.com/nullset.htm

Author
Paul Miller
Only so rarely do I ever even rent a horror movie, I'm just not that big
into them.  Scream, directed by Wes Craven, is one of those rare horror
movies that appeals to me because the characters are not stupid.
Anyway, the movie starts out with Casey having an evening at home.  A
mysterious man calls on the phone and pesters her with question from
horror movie.  "Who was the killer from Halloween" "Michael Myers" she
bellows very scardly.  She then proceeds to find that her boyfriend
Steve has already been murdered.  The thing that has done this is now
after her.  She sub-sequently dies and is hung. 
The story shifts to the aftermath of the killings at the local high
school.  Everyone is freaked out after their best friends Casey and
Steve have been killed.  The next victim is Sydney (Neve Campbell). 
Sidney manages to survive the attempt and her boyfriend found on the
scene is taken away to prison.
The movie spirals beyond the point of no return with you thinking about
four different people commited the crime...and it turns out how actually
did it is no one you would have ever imagined.
The bright spot of this movie was Henry Winkler.  Someone in the theater
bursted out "Hey, that's the Fonz."  He played the lovable principle at
the high school.
I loved this movie because it mixed the perfect amount of suspense,
comedy (yes, comedy), and not too much gore that it becomes disgusting.
The gore is plentiful; but not excessive.  I would recommend going to
see this movie if you haven't yet, ir if you have, go see it again.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Neve Campbell, Rose McGowan, Skeet Ulrich, Courteney Cox,=20
      David Arquette, Matthew Lillard, Jamie Kennedy, Drew Barrymore,=20
      Henry Winkler
Director: Wes Craven
Producers: Cary Woods and Cathy Konrad
Screenplay: Kevin Williamson
Cinematography: Mark Irwin
Music: Marco Beltrami
U.S. Distributor: Dimension Films
     SCREAM is a rarity:  a horror movie spoof that succeeds almost as=20
well at provoking scares as laughs.  That's because director Wes Craven=20
(A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET), in addition to having a genuine affection=20
for the genre, understands how wildly improbable and easy to lampoon it=20
is.  And, with SCREAM, he skewers it at every corner, using self-
referential humor and a flood of in-jokes (some subtle, some obvious).
     The list of movies mentioned or satirized is amazingly long, and=20
features everything from the 1931 Universal classic, FRANKENSTEIN, to=20
Tom Cruise's ALL THE RIGHT MOVES ("if you pause [the video] at the right=20
place, you can see his penis").  Craven, never one to take himself too=20
seriously, pokes fun at his own reputation and his movies, at one point=20
calling himself "Wes Carpenter" (an allusion to the numerous people who=20
confuse him with director John Carpenter).  References to Carpenter's=20
original HALLOWEEN abound; several minutes of footage from that film are=20
used here in a uniquely effective manner.
     SCREAM opens with a 12-minute prologue that introduces us to Casey=20
(Drew Barrymore), an all-American girl who's popping popcorn in=20
preparation for watching a video.  The phone rings, and there's a=20
mysterious voice on the other end.  He asks her what her favorite scary=20
movie is, and she replies that it's HALLOWEEN.  He then invites her to=20
play a game, but she gets freaked out and hangs up.  When he calls again=20
and she demands to know what he wants, his response is simple and=20
succinct:  "To see your insides."  The cat-and-mouse game continues=20
until both Casey and her boyfriend (who has the misfortune to stop by)=20
are gutted like fish.
     This double murder is only the beginning, however.  It appears that=20
the killer's real target is Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell, from TV's=20
PARTY OF FIVE), a high school girl with a troubled past.  One year ago,=20
Sidney's mother was raped and murdered in a highly-publicized case. =20
Now, when Sidney is attacked by someone wearing a Grim Reaper mask and=20
her boyfriend, Billy (Skeet Ulrich), is arrested, her life is turned=20
upside down.  From the bathrooms at school to a friend's house, the=20
stalking continues.  Meanwhile, an aggressive tabloid reporter=20
(Courteney Cox) begins harassing Sidney for a story. =20
     SCREAM never stops poking fun at itself.  Craven and screenwriter=20
Kevin Williamson allow their characters to make all sorts of disparaging=20
remarks about the horror movie cliches they're living (and dying)=20
through.  In describing why she doesn't like slasher flicks, Sidney=20
claims that "they're all the same=85 Some big-breasted blond who can't=20
act" does stupid things.  Another character, a video junkie (Jamie=20
Kennedy), describes all the gory, real-life events as "standard, horror=20
movie stuff=85 There's a formula to it -- a very simple formula."  Then,=20
as a group gathers to watch HALLOWEEN on TV, this same guy recites the=20
three rules of surviving a horror movie:  never have sex, never drink or=20
do drugs, and never say "I'll be right back." =20
     The most obvious and inventive parody in SCREAM involves a direct=20
takeoff of the killer-stalking-Jamie Lee Curtis-through-the-house=20
sequence from HALLOWEEN.  While that scene is playing on a TV, similar=20
events are happening in the very room where the TV sits.  In fact, as=20
Michael Myers is approaching Curtis' character from behind, the death-
masked killer is sneaking up on the guy watching the video, who is=20
screaming at the TV, "Look behind you!"  Since he's so knowledgeable=20
about the genre, he should consider heeding his own advice.
     The director doesn't do everything right.  The film's self-parody=20
aspects are sometimes too cute, and there are occasions when they dilute=20
attempts at shocks and suspense.  There are also a few too many twists=20
and turns in the script, and the ending is unnecessarily protracted.  In=20
general, SCREAM probably could have benefited from a little more=20
tightening up during either the scripting or the editing stage.
     Some of the casting choices are unusual.  Most of the major roles=20
go to fresh faces.  Neve Campbell, who doesn't have much feature=20
experience, finds the right tone for her character, allowing Sidney to=20
be a little tougher than the typical damsel in distress.  Courtney Cox,=20
on the other hand, is never believable as the tough-as-nails, career-
obsessed reporter.  Drew Barrymore and Henry Winkler (a.k.a. The Fonz,=20
as a high school principal) have cameos (Winkler's is uncredited).
     Craven couldn't have made this movie if he didn't understand both=20
his craft and what his fans expect.  Of all the mainstream horror=20
directors, he has been the one most willing to take chances.  In some=20
ways, SCREAM is an extension of WES CRAVEN'S NEW NIGHTMARE, which also=20
blurred the lines between motion pictures and real life.  This is a=20
horror film designed with movie-lovers in mind.  Beneath all the gore=20
and violence (and there's a lot of both), there's a keen sense of wit=20
and intelligence which sophisticated viewers are likely to appreciate. =20
And that makes this much more than a common slasher flick.  Have fun,=20
and remember that "movies don't create psychos; movies make psychos more=20
creative."
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Lars Lindahl
Starring David Arquette, Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Drew Barrymore, Skeet
Ulrich, Jamie Kennedy, Rose McGowan, Matthew Lillard, W. Earl Brown, Henry
Winkler, Live Schreiber, and Linda Blair.         
When I first heard about Scream in 1996, I was told that it was a spoof of
horror movies. From the master of the horror himself, Wes Craven, it ridiculed
the cliches of the genre by overemphasizing them, by making the teenagers do
what they know they're not supposed to do when a serial killer is stalking them
(don't run up the stairs when you can easily go out the front door, never say
"I'll be right back," etc.). When I first heard this description, I figured
that it was an easy way out of making a bad movie. How hard is it to make an
extremely terrible film but claim it is actually a mockery of other bad movies.
Was this Wes Craven's remedy from making "real" bad movies such as Vampires in
Brooklyn? It just seemed cheap to me. 
Then I actually saw the movie and the first twenty minutes, involving Drew
Barrymore and a nail-bitingly intense phone conversation, completely changed my
attitude. Scream is not only a clever parody of your standard horror flick,
it's also a pretty scary movie. If you've seen a million of these kinds of
films, you know exactly what is going to happen. This is part of the fun of
watching Scream. The movie reminds avid horror fans how similar and repetitive
the genre is and it also reminds them how great a guilty pleasure it can be to
watch pointless and predictable violence to innocent, attractive teenagers. To
those who rarely see these types of movies, Scream is a thrilling unpredictable
ride that could be mistaken as a serious slasher film. There's nothing wrong
with that misjudgment though. I have witnessed viewers from both sides of the
audience, the newbies to horror and the fanatics. Their opinions on the film
were so different but both very positive. From these varied reviews, I am
convinced that Scream has not only revived the teen horror movie and the normal
teen romance movies but also the hilarious parodies of these and other
categories. Films that both deride and celebrate genres like Galaxy Quest and
The Big Hit would not have existed, in my opinion, if it was not for the
outstanding success of Scream. The low - budget 1996 gem may, alongside Pulp
Fiction, be the most influential film of the 1990's. This influence may exist
to the chagrin of some moviegoers who despise movies like Teaching Mrs. Tingle
or television programs such as Dawson's Creek but to others such as myself, we
congratulate the movie that has opened new doors for excellent young actors,
screenwriters, and directors. 
Scream is also an extremely funny movie thanks to its quickly-paced script by
Kevin Williamson. Within the film are characters who tell other characters, as
well as the audience, the basic rules and cliches of a horror movie. Mainly
from the rants of Randy (Jamie Kennedy) and Stu (Matthew Lillard), we are
reminded not only of the obvious and hilarious rules but also some of the more
subtle stereotypes that when thought over are mostly true as well (the virgin
always survives; have sex and you're dead meat). Not only are we treated these
rules on a plate but also the rules are referenced to a number of different
films and actors. The script feels like an obsessive essay from a college film
geek who has nothing better to do but find every little blunder from every
little film for his own self-satisfaction.  In this case, Williamson finds
these errors for the audience's satisfaction and amusement. I hear there is a
new movie coming out called Scary Movie which is a spoof of Scream, which is a
spoof of scary movies. I will certainly see the film but I have the feeling
that this parody will be more obviously ridiculing the genre rather than
Scream's perfect subtlety. However my last gut feeling about this stuff,
Scream, was dead wrong... so who knows.

Author
Laurence Mixson
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Skeet Ulrich, David Arquette,
Matthew Lillard, Rose McGowan, and Drew Barrymore.
Review by Laurence Mixson (jarls@datasync.com)
        I expected one thing when I rented Scream and got some something
entirely different when I watched it. Which isn't really a bad thing, as
you can tell from my giving it ***1/2. So what's so different about this
movie? One main thing: it turns from a horror movie into a
murder-mystery gen-x docudrama. A good one, though.
        The film opens with Drew Barrymore in a house by herself, waiting for
her boyfriend, a big football player named Steve, I think, to arrive.
She starts to cook some popcorn. Although I can't recall the exact
dialogue, etc., she gets several phone calls from an unnamed stranger.
At first the phone calls seem innocent enough, but they soon turn into a
game of life-or-death. Needless to say, Drew and beau die. Very messily.
Kudos to the special-effects team for their very realistic depiction of
a disembowelment.
        Because dead people don't make very interesting character
studies(unless they're zombies)we're soon introduced to Sidney
Prescott(Neve Campbell), whose mother was murdered one year ago.
Although the "killer" was caught and sentenced to die soon afterwards,
Sidney is beginning to have her doubts after the recent killings. Of
course, that pesky tabloid reporter Gale Weathers(Courtney Cox), who
won't leave Sidney alone and is writing a book in which she very
strongly says that someone else was the killer doesn't help any...
        Sidney comes complete with your average assortment of movie friends:
There's her boyfriend Billy Loomis(Skeet Ulrich), the geeky movie
fanatic Randy(Jamie Kennedy), party animal Stuart Macher(Matthew
Lillard), Tatum Riley(Rose McGowan), and Rose's older brother, Deputy
Dewey Riley(David Arquette). Even the principal is played by Henry
Winkler. You know, the Fonz from Happy Days.
        Like I said earlier, this may be billed as a horror movie, but it
belongs more in comedy/drama. The murders are violent but not scary.
There's little suspense. We know who the killer is from about the 1st 30
minutes onward. But this isn't a bad movie. It's very good. For horror
fans, it's filled with tons of references and inside jokes. For example,
Stu Macher is named after Joel Schumacher, who directed The Lost Boys.
Billy Loomis is named after Dr. Loomis in Halloween, which actually
plays a big role in this movie. Even Wes Craven has a cameo as the
school janitor, complete with a Freddy Krueger shirt on.
        The body count in this movie is pretty high, but the surprising amount
of characters coming back to life is even higher. I can recall offhand
four characters who we think are dead coming back. Of course, one of
them is the killer. Which brings us to the antagonist.
        The killer is known simply as The Ghostface Killer, or Father Death,
from the costume he wears. It's pretty good, actually. It'd scare me if
he showed up at MY door.
        There are a few qualms I have about Scream, though they're pretty
minor. This movie was originally going to be called Scary Movie, as kind
of a farce, but Miramax/Dimension Films thought that sounded too corny.
Apparently, this decision wasn't made until after the film was finished
shooting, though, as the words "scary movie" are used almost a dozen
times. Also, some scenes aren't very plausible. Are we to believe that a
house full of people wouldn't notice someone crushed at the top of the
garage? And the killer's motive is weakly explained at the
not-very-scary end, not really making much sense. But these are minor
misgivings. Rent the movie. It's one of the better films of 1996. I'm
just waiting for Scream: The Sequel.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Fiendishly smart mutation of the slasher genre, in which the
awareness of the genre's exploitations by the characters is a main point.
"Do you like SCARY movies?" oozes the voice on the phone.
"Yeah, sure," says the bored girl who's getting real sick of this persistent
wrong-number weirdo. She gets fed up with him calling her and pestering her
about scary movies. So she hangs up. And in he comes with a knife the size
of a hatchet.
And with that we are off and running with SCREAM, Wes Craven's best movie
since NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET -- quite possibly his best movie ever. After
NIGHTMARE, Craven went on to make a string of muddled and disappointing
movies -- DEADLY FRIEND and SHOCKER stand out as two of the worst. But then
he came out of nowhere with SCREAM (working title: "Scary Movie"), which
takes the whole
how-come-people-in-a-horror-movie-don't-ever-do-the-SMART-thing? notion,
feeds it back into a fiendishly constructed story about a madman on the
loose, and lets the whole thing fly. It isn't a parody -- it's too intense
and genuinely scary to be one -- and it isn't a straight playback of slasher
cliches. It's more like a neat new mutation of the genre, a crossbreeding of
ideas to create something really new and creative.
The killer's m.o. is set up in the first scene: he calls someone, taunts
them with sneering jibes about scary movies, and then come in and stabs them
to death. A lot. To hide his identity, he goes running about with a black
cloak and a "Father Death" mask on. (Be forewarned that there is a good deal
of on-camera bloodshed in this movie -- nothing that a seasoned horror
veteran can't take, but those expecting a lightearted parody a la HAUNTED
HONEYMOON are advised to stand clear.) He (?) is stalking and murdering the
friends and relatives of a young girl whose mother was raped and murdered by
a serial killer almost exactly one year ago. Her friends -- some witty, some
boorish, some hilariously insensitive -- have various theories about who,
how and why. None of them are correct.
The killer continues his rampage, drawing attention from the media. One of
the folks who gets interested is a tabloid-style journalist who dashed off a
bestselling book about the mother's murderer -- only she's convinced that
the killer was framed, and that the real perp is still on the loose. Nobody
buys the theory... at first. But as the clues and bodies pile up, it's plain
that something even more bizarre than what we can see is afoot.
SCREAM knows its territory. (If it didn't, I'd worry about Mr. Craven's
right to his throne.) It's loaded with in-jokes about horror movies (see how
many you can rack up) -- but most importantly, it's populated by people who
are perfectly aware of how horror-movieish the whole thing is. Also, they
don't just lie down when the killer storms in: they throw everything that
isn't nailed down at the guy. Slam doors in his face. Trip him up. Smash
bottles over his head. Do everything except shove him into a meat grinder
(and believe me, I was expecting something along such Grand Guignol
proportions). But like all good slasher villains, he does the Timex thing
and keeps ticking.
The final 40 minutes of the movie is one giant blood-soaked war zone that's
reminiscent of the hair-raising ending of another, quite dissimilar movie --
BLOOD SIMPLE -- which used bizarre plot mechanics and double-backs to keep
the audience shrieking. By the time you get to the final act, the tables
have been turned so many times you'd think they were on Lazy Susans. It's
both funny and horrific, and I will not reveal a single thing about how it
gets tied up, except that a couple of people have *some* of their theories
about who dies and who lives in horror movies proved quite correct.
Last note: SCREAM seems to have revitalized b.o. interest in horror movies
-- a waning genre since the 80s, poisoned by endless and lame sequels and
hordes of uninteresting ripoffs. I anticipate a wave of imitations in the
wake of this one -- and, unfortunately, another case of hardening of the
arteries. SCREAM 2 is already in the works.
